Missouri, session 2026, SB1075.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 208, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 208.270, to read as
follows:
208.270. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Food is Medicine Act". The department of
social services shall apply to the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services of the federal Department of Health and
Human Services for a Section 1115 demonstration waiver to
implement the "Food is Medicine" program for the purpose of
providing nutrition supports through the MO HealthNet
program. The food is medicine program shall be designed to
improve health outcomes for MO HealthNet participants with
nutrition-related chronic diseases through nutrition
services and to reduce the need for medical care for those
participants.
2. Nutrition services covered under this program may
include, but shall not be limited to, the following:
(1) Case management;
(2) Nutrition counseling;
(3) Meals or pantry stocking;

SB 1075 2
(4) Nutrition prescriptions; and
(5) Grocery provisions.
3. Whenever feasible, the MO HealthNet division shall
prioritize the inclusion of community-based organizations
and local growers to support the purchase of locally grown
food in nutrition prescriptions.
✓